Vermont, session 2025-2026, H596.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4257 is amended to read:
§ 4257. PREVENTION AND TREATMENT OF OPIOID-RELATED
OVERDOSES
* * *
(b) For the purpose of addressing prescription and nonprescription opioid
overdoses in Vermont, the Department shall develop and implement a
VT LEG #386228 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.596
2026 Page 2 of 3
prevention, intervention, and response strategy, depending on available
resources, that shall:
(1) provide educational materials on opioid overdose prevention to the
public free of charge;
(2) increase community-based prevention programs aimed at reducing
risk factors that lead to opioid overdoses;
(3) increase timely access to treatment services for opioid users,
including medication for opioid use disorder;
(4)(A) educate substance use treatment providers on methods to prevent
opioid overdoses;
(B) provide education, information, and training on overdose
prevention, intervention, and response, including the status of legal possession
of substances and harm reduction supplies, to individuals living with opioid
use disorder and participating in needle and syringe exchange programs,
recovery programs, residential substance use disorder treatment programs, or
correctional services;
(5) implement and expand hospital referral services for individuals
treated for an opioid overdose, including ensuring that a patient receive a
mental health screening after the administration of an opioid antagonist;
VT LEG #386228 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.596
2026 Page 3 of 3
(6) develop a statewide opioid antagonist program that emphasizes
access to opioid antagonists to and for the benefit of individuals with opioid
use disorder;
(7) distribute opioid antagonists to assist those at risk of experiencing an
opioid-related overdose; and
(8) establish opioid antagonist dispensing kiosks in locations accessible
to those at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386228 v.1